Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.0172

Commission successor to other boards, committee.

The commission is the successor in interest of the board of chiropractic examiners, the chiropractic disciplinary board, and the chiropractic peer review committee. All contracts, undertakings, agreements, rules, regulations, and policies of those bodies continue in full force and effect on July 1, 1994, unless otherwise repealed or rejected by chapter 9, Laws of 1994 sp. sess. or by the commission.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 119.]